Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1002.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1314-A. Parental Notification of Certain Incidents Required.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each school entity shall adopt a policy on how to notify the parents or legal guardians of each student who threatens suicide or is involved in an incident of bullying, as defined in section 1303.1-A, inform each school entity employe and the parent or legal guardian of each student enrolled in the school entity of the policy and post the policy on the school entity's publicly 12345678910111213141516171819 accessible Internet website. The policy adopted by a school entity under this subsection may be based upon the model policy developed by the department under subsection (c). If a school entity notifies a parent or legal guardian of an incident or threat required to be reported, the school entity shall:(1) Produce and maintain a record verifying that the parent or legal guardian was notified of the incident or threat. Records under this paragraph shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(2) Provide the parent or legal guardian with suicide prevention materials and information, which shall include information on ways to limit the student's access to fatal means, including a firearm or medication.(b) A school entity shall:(1) Provide a student with a copy of a record maintained under subsection (a) that relates to the student if the student requests a copy of the record.(2) Expunge a school record maintained under subsection (a) that relates to the student if the student has graduated from high school and requests that the record be expunged.(c) The department shall:(1) Develop a model policy on how to notify the parents or legal guardians of a student that the student has threatened suicide or been involved in an incident of bullying and make the policy available to all school entities and, upon request, to nonpublic schools. The department may develop the model policy in consultation with a youth suicide prevention organization operating in this Commonwealth.(2) Compile, develop and post on the department's publicly 20250HB1002PN1089 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible Internet website resources and age-appropriate educational materials on youth suicide awareness and prevention, including ways to limit a student's access to fatal means, including firearms and medication. The department shall make the resources and education materials available to all school entities and, upon request, to nonpublic schools.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1002PN1089 - 3 - 1234567